Maryland, session 2026, HB0597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–510.3.
(b) This section applies only in Montgomery County.
(c) (1) There is a Community Choice Aggregation Pilot Program.
(2) Beginning December 31, 2023, a county may form a community choice
aggregator under this section.
(t) (1) The pilot program shall:
(i) begin on the earlier of:
– 1 –

Ch. 347 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. the date that a county gives notice to the Commission of
its intention to initiate a process to form a community choice aggregator, in accordance with
subsection (d)(1)(v) of this section; or
2. April 1, [2024] 2026; and
(ii) end [7] 9 years after the beginning date, but not sooner than
April 1, 2031.
(2) On or before April 1 of the [sixth] SEVENTH year after the beginning of
the pilot program, the Commission shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, report to the General Assembly on the status and effectiveness of the
pilot program.
(u) (1) At the conclusion of the pilot program described in this section, the
Commission shall study:
(i) the overall costs and benefits of the pilot program;
(ii) whether there were any incremental costs borne by standard
offer service customers resulting from the migration of customers between the community
choice aggregator and standard offer service; and
(iii) what mechanisms could be implemented to hold standard offer
service customers harmless from any incremental costs borne by standard offer service
customers identified under item (ii) of this paragraph.
(2) The Commission shall seek the advice and recommendation of the
Community Choice Energy Workgroup in the study required under this subsection.
(3) On or before December 31, [2031] 2035, the Commission shall report
the findings of the study to the Governor and the General Assembly, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –